Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1920
Indigent defendant; costs; how taxed.

Whenever a defendant is adjudged indigent, the reasonable costs incurred in the operation of the provisions of sections 29-1912 to 29-1921 shall be taxed as costs against the prosecuting authority.

Laws 1969, c. 235, § 9, p. 871.